Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2184.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 18.59.020 and 2011 c 88 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "Board" means the board of occupational therapy practice.(2) "Department" means the department of health.(3) "Intramuscular needling," also known as "dry needling," means a skilled intervention that uses a single use, sterile filiform needle to penetrate the skin and stimulate underlying myofascial trigger points and connective and muscular tissues for the evaluation and management of neuromusculoskeletal pain and movement impairments. "Intramuscular needling" requires an examination and diagnosis. "Intramuscular needling" does not include needle retention without stimulation or the stimulation of auricular and distal points.(4) "Occupational therapist" means a person licensed to practice occupational therapy under this chapter.(((4)))(5) "Occupational therapy" is the scientifically based use of purposeful activity with individuals who are limited by physical injury or illness, psychosocial dysfunction, developmental or learning disabilities, or the aging process in order to maximize independence, prevent disability, and maintain health. The practice encompasses evaluation, treatment, and consultation. Specific occupational therapy services include but are not limited to: Using specifically designed activities and exercises to enhance neurodevelopmental, cognitive, perceptual motor, sensory integrative, and psychomotor functioning; administering and interpreting tests such as manual muscle and sensory integration; teaching daily living skills; developing prevocational skills and play and avocational capabilities; designing, fabricating, or applying selected orthotic and prosthetic devices or selected adaptive equipment; wound care management as provided in RCW 18.59.170; performing intramuscular needling; and adapting environments for persons with disabilities. These services are provided individually, in groups, or through social systems.(((5)))(6) "Occupational therapy aide" means a person who is trained to perform specific occupational therapy techniques under professional supervision as defined by the board but who does not perform activities that require advanced training in the sciences or practices involved in the profession of occupational therapy.(((6)))(7) "Occupational therapy assistant" means a person licensed to assist in the practice of occupational therapy under the supervision or with the regular consultation of an occupational therapist.(((7)))(8) "Occupational therapy practitioner" means a person who is credentialed as an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant.(((8)))(9) "Person" means any individual, partnership, unincorporated organization, or corporate body, except that only an individual may be licensed under this chapter.(((9)))(10) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.(((10)))(11) "Sharp debridement" means the removal of loose or loosely adherent devitalized tissue with the use of tweezers, scissors, or scalpel, without any type of anesthesia other than topical anesthetics. "Sharp debridement" does not mean surgical debridement.(((11)))(12) "Wound care management" means a part of occupational therapy treatment that facilitates healing, prevents edema, infection, and excessive scar formation, and minimizes wound complications. Treatment may include: Assessment of wound healing status; patient education; selection and application of dressings; cleansing of the wound and surrounding areas; application of topical medications, as provided under RCW 18.59.160; use of physical agent modalities; application of pressure garments and nonweight-bearing orthotic devices, excluding high-temperature custom foot orthotics made from a mold; sharp debridement of devitalized tissue; debridement of devitalized tissue with other agents; and adapting activities of daily living to promote independence during wound healing.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 18.59 RCW to read as follows:(1)(a) Subject to the limitations of this section, an occupational therapist may perform intramuscular needling only after being issued an intramuscular needling endorsement by the secretary. The secretary, upon approval by the board, shall issue an endorsement to an occupational therapist who has at least one year of postgraduate practice experience that averages at least 36 hours a week and consists of direct patient care and who provides evidence in a manner acceptable to the board of a total of 325 hours of instruction and clinical experience that meet or exceed the following criteria:(i) A total of 100 hours of didactic instruction in the following areas:(A) Anatomy and physiology of the musculoskeletal and neuromuscular systems;(B) Anatomical basis of pain mechanisms, chronic pain, and referred pain;(C) Trigger point evaluation and management;(D) Universal precautions in avoiding contact with a patient's bodily fluids; and(E) Preparedness and response to unexpected events including, but not limited to, injury to blood vessels, nerves, and organs, and psychological effects or complications;(ii) A total of 75 hours of in-person intramuscular needling instruction in the following areas:(A) Intramuscular needling technique;(B) Intramuscular needling indications and contraindications;(C) Documentation and informed consent for intramuscular needling;(D) Management of adverse effects;(E) Practical psychomotor competency; and(F) Occupational safety and health administration's bloodborne pathogens protocol;(iii) A successful clinical review of a minimum of 150 hours of at least 150 individual intramuscular needling treatment sessions by a qualified provider. An occupational therapist seeking endorsement must submit an affidavit to the department demonstrating successful completion of this clinical review.(b) As long as the requirements in (a)(i), (ii), and (iii) of this subsection are documented by the applicant, required education, supervised instruction, and clinical review may occur or may have occurred in another state or jurisdiction.(2) A qualified provider must be one of the following:(a) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW; an osteopathic physician licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW; a licensed naturopath under chapter 18.36A RCW; a licensed acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner under chapter 18.06 RCW; a licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner under chapter 18.79 RCW; or any of these providers licensed through an interstate compact or by another state;(b) An occupational or physical therapist credentialed to perform intramuscular needling in any branch of the United States armed forces;(c) A licensed physical therapist who currently holds an intramuscular needling endorsement; or(d) A licensed physical therapist who meets the requirements of the intramuscular needling endorsement.(3) After receiving 100 hours of didactic instruction and 75 hours of in-person intramuscular needling instruction, an occupational therapist seeking endorsement has up to 18 months to complete a minimum of 150 treatment sessions for review.(4) An occupational therapist may not delegate intramuscular needling and must remain in constant attendance of the patient for the entirety of the procedure.(5) An occupational therapist can apply for endorsement before they have one year of clinical practice experience if they can meet the requirement of 100 hours of didactic instruction and 75 hours of in-person intramuscular needling instruction in subsection (1)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section through their prelicensure coursework and has completed all other requirements set forth in this chapter.(6) If an occupational therapist is intending to perform intramuscular needling on a patient who the occupational therapist knows is being treated by an acupuncturist or acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner for the same diagnosis, the occupational therapist shall make reasonable efforts to coordinate patient care with the acupuncturist or acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner to prevent conflict or duplication of services.(7) All patients receiving intramuscular needling from an occupational therapist must sign an informed consent form that includes:(a) The definition of intramuscular needling;(b) A description of the risks of intramuscular needling;(c) A description of the benefits of intramuscular needling;(d) A description of the potential side effects of intramuscular needling; and(e) A statement clearly differentiating the procedure from the practice of acupuncture.(8) Intramuscular needling may not be administered as a stand-alone treatment within an occupational therapy care plan.--- END ---